Louisiana, session 2026, HB544.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 6-F of Title 18 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 18:1300.41 through 1300.47, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-496 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 544
CHAPTER 6-F. CITIZENS ADVISORY REFERENDUM
§1300.41. Citizens Advisory Referendum; Petition
A.(1) A parish governing authority may hold a parish wide referendum for
advisory purposes if at least ten percent of registered voters within the parish sign
a petition expressing their desire to have a certain matter on the ballot.
(2) Whenever a citizens advisory referendum is sought by the registered
voters within a parish, a petition shall be directed to the parish governing authority.
The petition shall be limited to the request that an election be called and held in the
parish for the purpose of putting a question on the ballot. No petition for a citizens
advisory referendum shall seek to put more than one question on the ballot.
(3) The secretary of state shall provide a form approved by the attorney
general to be used for the petition to call a citizens advisory referendum. Such form
shall include pre-printed line numbers and shall be in conformity with all other
provisions of this Chapter and R.S. 18:3. All citizens advisory referendum petitions
shall be on an approved form or on a form which contains the same information
required by the approved form, and any petition not on such a form shall be invalid.
B.(1) All signatures on a citizens advisory referendum petition shall be
handwritten.
(2) The petition shall be signed by at least ten percent of the total number of
registered voters of the parish wherein the citizens advisory referendum election is
petitioned.
C.(1) Prior to the entering of any signatures on a petition, the chairman
designated to represent the petitioners shall file with the secretary of state a copy of
the citizens advisory referendum petition which will be used and copies of a picture
identification that contain the name and signature of the chairman and vice chairman,
respectively, or copies of current utility bills, bank statements, government checks,
paychecks, or other government documents that show the name and address of the
chairman and vice chairman, respectively. Upon receipt of the citizens advisory
referendum petition, the secretary of state shall provide to the chairman and vice
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-496 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 544
chairman, respectively, a document prepared by the secretary of state in conjunction
with the Louisiana Registrars of Voters Association, subject to approval as to content
by the attorney general, providing general information on petition requirements and
deadlines. Upon receipt of the citizens advisory referendum petition, the secretary
of state shall endorse thereon the fact and the date of filing, and this unsigned copy
of the citizens advisory referendum petition shall be a public record. A copy shall
be transmitted by the secretary of state to the registrar of voters for the parish in
which the citizens advisory referendum election is to be held. The chairman shall
list on the petition the parish where the citizens advisory referendum election is to
be held. The petition shall be considered filed when it is received in the office of the
secretary of state. Upon receipt of the citizens advisory referendum petition, the
secretary of state shall produce a report of the number of qualified electors in the
parish wherein the citizens advisory referendum election is sought as of the date of
receipt of the citizens advisory referendum petition and shall notify the registrar of
voters in the parish of the number of qualified electors in the parish for issuance of
the certification.
(2)(a) The signed and dated petition shall be submitted to the registrar of
voters for the parish where the citizens advisory referendum election is to be held not
later than one hundred eighty days after the day on which the copy of the petition
was filed with the secretary of state. If the final day for submitting the signed and
dated petition falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the deadline for filing
such petition shall be on the next day which is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal
holiday. Upon receipt of the signed and dated petition, the registrar of voters shall
affix the date received and a page number to the front of each page of the petition.
(b) With the citizens advisory referendum petition, the chairman shall also
submit to the registrar of voters an affidavit verifying the number of signatures
submitted along with a statement that to the best of his knowledge all documents
submitted are originals and not photocopies.
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-496 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 544
(3)(a) The chairman shall file notice with the registrar on the third day before
the petition is submitted to the registrar that he will submit the petition and the date
of such submission, unless such submission is made within three days prior to the
expiration of the period for submitting such petition. Such notice of submission shall
be a public record. If the notice filed with the registrar on the third day before the
petition is submitted includes a date for submitting the signed and dated petition
which falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or other legal holiday, the registrar shall so
inform the chairman and advise the chairman of the next day which is not a Saturday,
Sunday, or other legal holiday and on which the petition is to be submitted.
(b) The chairman shall provide written notice by certified mail, return receipt
requested, to the parish governing authority where the citizens advisory referendum
election is sought on the third day before the petition is submitted to the registrar.
D. Each elector, at the time of signing the petition, shall enter his address and
the date on which the elector signed beside or underneath his signature; however, if
a person is unable to write, as provided in R.S. 18:1300.43, the two witnesses shall
date their signatures. In addition, each petition shall be in compliance with the
provisions of R.S. 18:3. In determining the number of qualified electors who signed
the petition, the registrar of voters shall not count any signature which does not
comply with all of the requirements of R.S. 18:3 or bears a date prior to the date on
which the copy of the petition initially was filed with the secretary of state or after
the date of the submission of the petition to the registrar except as otherwise
provided in R.S. 18:1300.42(B). The registrar shall not receive or certify a petition
submitted to him for certification unless it is submitted to him timely.
§1300.42. Certification of registered voters; addition or withdrawal of signatures;
designation as a public record; form of names
A.(1)(a) The registrar of voters of the parish wherein a citizens advisory
referendum election is sought shall certify on the citizens advisory referendum
petition the number of names appearing thereon, the number of qualified electors of
the parish whose handwritten signatures appear on the petition, and the total number
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-496 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 544
of electors within the parish as of the date of the filing of the petition with the
secretary of state. Each registrar shall indicate on the petition the names appearing
thereon who are not electors of the parish. Each person who participates in the
review of the names on the petition for certification by the registrar as required in
this Section shall initial each of those portions of the petition which the person
reviews for certification by the registrar.
(b) The registrar of voters for the parish in which the citizens advisory
referendum election is to be held may request and accept the assistance of employees
of the Department of State and registrars and deputy registrars of voters from other
parishes to complete the certification of the citizens advisory referendum petition.
Each person offering such assistance shall be considered a deputy registrar of the
requesting parish registrar for that purpose only.
(2) The registrar of voters shall complete the certification of the citizens
advisory referendum petition within thirty working days after it is presented to him
for that purpose.
B. The registrar of voters shall honor the written request of any voter who
either desires to have his handwritten signature stricken from the petition or desires
to have his handwritten signature added to the petition at any time after receipt of the
signed petition as provided in R.S. 18:1300.41(C) but prior to certification of the
petition or within five days after receipt of such signed petition, whichever is earlier.
If the deadline for removing or adding a signature to the petition falls on a Saturday,
Sunday, or legal holiday, then the next day which is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal
holiday shall be deemed to be the deadline for removing or adding a signature to the
petition. The written request of the voter shall include the name and address of the
voter, the signature of the voter, the date of birth of the voter, and the date.
C. When there is no registrar of voters, or deputy registrar of voters in a
parish, or in case of the absence or inability of that officer, the clerk of the district
court of the parish shall execute the certificate.
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-496 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 544
D. When any officer designated in this Chapter refuses to execute the
certificates provided for, any signer of a citizens advisory referendum petition, or the
chairman or vice chairman designated to represent the signers, may compel the
execution of the certificates by summary process in the district court having
jurisdiction over the officer.
E. The registrar of voters shall comply with the provisions of R.S. 18:3 when
determining the number of qualified electors of the voting area who signed the
petition.
§1300.43. Signature to a citizens advisory referendum petition
No person may sign any name to a citizens advisory referendum other than
his own, except in a case where a person is unable to write, in which case the
incapacitated person shall affix his mark to the petition and the person circulating the
petition shall affix the name and address of the incapacitated person, as well as the
date on which the incapacitated person affixed his mark to the petition, provided he
does so in the presence of two witnesses who shall also sign their names as witnesses
to the mark.
§1300.44. Chairman and vice chairman designated in petition; petition designated
as a public record
A. The citizens advisory referendum petition shall designate a chairman to
act for the signers of the petition in all matters, and a vice chairman to act on order
of the chairman or in case of the death, disability, absence, or resignation of the
chairman. The petition shall include the full name, signature, and residence address
of the chairman and the vice chairman. The chairman and vice chairman each shall
be a qualified voter in the parish from which the citizens advisory referendum
election is being sought.
B. Ninety days following the signature of the first elector, the citizens
advisory referendum petition, including the name, address, and signature of each
elector who has signed thereon, becomes a public record. The chairman, or the vice
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-496 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 544
chairman when acting as the chairman, shall be the custodian thereof. The petition
and the custodian shall be subject to all of the provisions of R.S. 44:31 et seq.
C. Upon the filing of the petition pursuant to R.S. 18:1300.41(C)(2), the
chairman, or the vice chairman when acting as chairman, shall no longer be the
custodian thereof.
§1300.45. Reason for a citizens advisory referendum stated in petition; form of
question
The petition shall contain the question to be submitted to the voters at an
election and shall have a clear statement that the results of the election are for
advisory purposes only and are non-binding. The form and preparation of the
question shall be in the manner prescribed in R.S. 18:1299.1.
§1300.46. Results of election
The majority of the votes cast shall determine the result of the citizens
advisory referendum election. If the matter on the citizens advisory referendum
ballot receives a majority of votes cast, the majority of voters will be deemed to be
in favor of the matter. Votes shall be tabulated and returns made, declared, and
promulgated as at a general election. The results of the citizens advisory referendum
election are for advisory purposes only.
§1300.47. Citizens Advisory referendum elections, conduct in accordance with
Election Code
Elections for a citizens advisory referendum shall be held under and in
accordance with the applicable provisions of the Louisiana Election Code, except as
otherwise specifically provided in this Chapter.